Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 13. Hotels and Boardinghouses.

Sec. 34.35.510.
Hotel and boardinghouse operator’s liens.

The operator of a hotel or boardinghouse has a lien upon, and may retain, all baggage and other property lawfully in the possession of a guest for all proper charges owed by the guest to the hotel or boardinghouse operator.
However, this section does not apply when the baggage or other property is not owned by the guest and the hotel or boardinghouse operator has actual notice of this fact.

History.

(§ 2 ch 184 SLA 1968)

Collateral references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d, Hotels, Motels, and Restaurants, §§ 175-186.

43A C.J.S., Inns, Hotels, and Eating Places, §§
28–31.

Sec. 34.35.520.
Disposition of property to satisfy liens.

If a lien under AS

34.35.510

is not satisfied within 60 days after the charges become due, the hotel or boardinghouse operator may proceed to sell the baggage or other property held under the lien at public auction. Ten days before the sale the hotel or boardinghouse operator shall give notice of the time and place of sale by posting notice in three public places in the town or city where the hotel or boardinghouse is located and by mailing notice of the time and place to the owner of the baggage or other property at the place of residence as set out in the hotel or boardinghouse register. If the guest failed to register or to give sufficient address, the required notice shall be mailed to the guest at the city or town where the hotel or boardinghouse is located. When the notice requirements of this section have been complied with, the sale of the baggage or other property is a perpetual bar to an action against the hotel or boardinghouse operator for recovery of baggage, property, or their value.

After satisfaction of the lien and payment of all legal charges for storage and expenses incurred in selling the property, the remaining proceeds of the sale shall, within one year, be paid to the guest upon demand.

History.

(§ 2 ch 184 SLA 1968)

Sec. 34.35.530.
Definitions.

In AS

34.35.510

—

34.35.530

,

“guest” includes every person who is a member of the family of, or dependent upon, a guest, boarder, or lodger in a hotel or boardinghouse;

“hotel or boardinghouse” includes any building held out to the public to be an inn, motel, hotel, or public lodginghouse, or place where sleeping accommodations, whether with or without meals, are furnished for hire to transient guests;

“operator” includes innkeeper, proprietor, keeper, owner, lessee, or manager of a hotel or boardinghouse.

History.

(§ 2 ch 184 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1985 to alphabetize the defined terms.